Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-108
Signature, how construed.

The word signature includes the mark of a person unable to write his name; a mark shall have the same effect as a signature when the name is written by some other person and the mark is made near thereto by the person unable to write his name.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 253, p. 782;

R.S.1913, § 8908;

C.S.1922, § 9929;

C.S.1929, § 29-108;

R.S.1943, § 29-108.